Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6404.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 17011. (1) An individual shall not engage in the practice of medicine or practice as a physician's assistant unless licensed or otherwise authorized by this article. An individual shall not engage in teaching or research that requires the practice of medicine unless the individual is licensed or otherwise authorized by this article. (2) Notwithstanding section 16145 or rules promulgated under that section, the board may grant a license to an individual who meets the requirements of section 16186 or 17031(2) after reviewing the applicant's record of practice, experience, and credentials and determining that the applicant is competent to practice medicine. (3) For individuals applying for licensure under section 16186, the board shall not impose requirements on graduates of medical schools located outside the United States or Canada that exceed the requirements imposed on graduates of medical schools located in the United States or Canada. (4) Notwithstanding section 16145 or rules promulgated under that section, the board may grant a license in accordance with section 16186 after determining that each of the following conditions is satisfied: (a) The applicant has disclosed that a sanction is in force against him or her the applicant as described in section 16174(2)(b) and considering the reasons for the sanction and the applicant's record of practice, experience, credentials, and competence to engage in the practice of medicine, that sanction should not prevent the applicant from being granted a license in this state. (b) The sanction imposed by the other state is not permanent. (c) The sanction imposed by the other state was not the result of a patient safety violation. (d) If the applicant was required by the state that imposed the sanction to participate in and complete a probationary period or treatment plan as a condition of the continuation of his or her the applicant's licensure, the applicant did not complete the probationary period or treatment plan because the applicant ceased engaging in the practice of medicine in that state. (e) As a condition of licensure under this subsection, the applicant voluntarily agrees to complete a probationary period or treatment plan, the terms of which are no less stringent than those imposed by the state that imposed the sanction. (5) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (6), the following words, titles, or letters or a combination thereof, with or without qualifying words or phrases, are restricted in use only to those individuals authorized under this part to use the terms and in a way prescribed in this part: "doctor of medicine", "m.d.", "physician's assistant", and "p.a.". A physician's assistant may also use the title "physician associate". (6) Notwithstanding section 16261, an individual who was specially trained at an institution of higher education in this state to assist a physician in the field of orthopedics and, upon completion of training, received a 2-year associate of science degree as an orthopedic physician's assistant before January 1, 1977 may use the title "orthopedic physician's assistant" whether or not the individual is licensed under this part. Sec. 17060. The department, in consultation with the task force, shall do all of the following: (a) Promulgate rules necessary for the implementation of its powers and duties under this part and may perform the acts and make the determinations necessary for the proper implementations of those powers and duties. (b) Promulgate rules to establish the requirements for the education, training, or experience of physician's assistants for licensure in this state. The requirements must take into account nationally recognized standards for education, training, and experience and the desired utilization of physician's assistants. By January 14, 2017, the rules must include training standards for identifying victims of human trafficking. The training standards for identifying victims of human trafficking must apply for a physician's assistant license or registration renewal beginning with the first renewal cycle after the rules are promulgated and for an initial license or registration issued 5 or more years after the rules are promulgated. (c) Grant licenses to applicants who meet the requirements of this part and the rules promulgated under this part for practice and for the use of the title of titles of physician's assistant and physician associate. (d) Promulgate rules to establish criteria for the evaluation of programs for the education and training of physician's assistants for the purpose of determining whether graduates of the programs have the knowledge and skills requisite for practice and for the use of the title titles of physician's assistant and physician associate in this state as defined prescribed by this part and the rules promulgated under this part. The criteria established must be substantially consistent with nationally recognized standards for the education and training of physician's assistants. Until the criteria are established, the criteria developed by the advisory commission on physician's assistants shall remain remains in effect. The department shall consider and may use where appropriate the criteria established by professional associations, education accrediting bodies, or governmental agencies. In establishing criteria for the evaluation of education and training programs, the department may seek the advice of the boards and the department of education. Sec. 17072. (1) A The department shall issue a certificate of licensure, temporary licensure, or renewal shall be issued by the department to an applicant who is granted licensure, temporary licensure, or renewal. A certificate of licensure issued under this part shall must contain the full name of the individual licensed, a permanent individual number, and the date of expiration. (2) The task force shall direct the board to grant interim licensure to an unlicensed individual who was employed as a physician's assistant on December 29, 1977, to be effective until the task force formally issues or denies a license to the physician's assistant pursuant to under this part and the rules promulgated under this part. During this period the task force may direct the board to grant interim licensure to a new applicant who has graduated from a program training physician's assistants. (3) The task force may direct the board to grant a nonrenewable temporary license to an applicant who meets all requirements for licensure except examination, if required. The task force shall make its decision within 30 days after submission of a complete application or the conclusion of a department investigation, whichever is later. The temporary license shall be is valid for a period determined by the task force, but not to exceed 1 year, or until the results of a required examination are made available, whichever is sooner. The department shall issue a certificate of temporary licensure within 15 days after the board grants the license. (4) A physician's assistant licensed under this part shall publicly display the current certificate of licensure, temporary license, or renewal permanently in that individual's place of practice, if feasible, and shall have available for inspection a pocket card issued by the department containing the essential information of the license. While working, the individual shall wear appropriate identification, clearly indicating that the individual is a physician's assistant or physician associate. Sec. 17082. (1) The task force may conduct or cause to be conducted, investigations and evaluations necessary to determine whether a program meets the criteria established by this part and rules promulgated under this part. (2) At times the task force determines appropriate, the task force may revise the criteria for the education and training of graduates to determine whether the graduates meet the requirements for practice and for the use of the title titles of physician's assistant and physician associate in this state. (3) A program approval of formerly approved by the director of public health and the criteria developed or recommended by the physician's assistant's advisory commission permitted under section 20 of former Act No. 420 of the Public Acts of 1976 shall be continued 1976 PA 420 continues for the duration of its initial approval, unless disapproved by the task force. Sec. 17511. (1) A person An individual shall not engage in the practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery or practice as a physician's assistant unless licensed or otherwise authorized by this article. (2) Notwithstanding section 16145 or rules promulgated under that section, the board may grant a license in accordance with section 16186 after determining that each of the following conditions is satisfied: (a) The applicant has disclosed that a sanction is in force against him or her the applicant as described in section 16174(2)(b) and considering the reasons for the sanction and the applicant's record of practice, experience, credentials, and competence to engage in the practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery, that sanction should not prevent the applicant from being granted a license in this state. (b) The sanction imposed by the other state is not permanent. (c) The sanction imposed by the other state was not the result of a patient safety violation. (d) If the applicant was required by the state that imposed the sanction to participate in and complete a probationary period or treatment plan as a condition of the continuation of his or her the applicant's licensure, the applicant did not complete the probationary period or treatment plan because the applicant ceased engaging in the practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery in that state. (e) As a condition of licensure under this subsection, the applicant voluntarily agrees to complete a probationary period or treatment plan, the terms of which are no less stringent than those imposed by the state that imposed the sanction. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (4), the following words, titles, or letters or a combination thereof, with or without qualifying words or phrases, are restricted in use only to those persons individuals authorized under this part to use the terms and in a way prescribed in this part: "osteopath", "osteopathy", "osteopathic practitioner", "doctor of osteopathy", "diplomate in osteopathy", "d.o.", "physician's assistant", and "p.a.". A physician's assistant may also use the title "physician associate". (4) Notwithstanding section 16261, a person an individual who was specially trained at an institution of higher education in this state to assist a physician in the field of orthopedics and, upon completion of training, received a 2-year associate of science degree as an orthopedic physician's assistant before January 1, 1977 may use the title "orthopedic physician's assistant" whether or not the individual is licensed under this part. Sec. 18011. (1) A person An individual shall not engage in the practice of podiatric medicine and surgery or practice as a physician's assistant unless licensed or otherwise authorized by this article. (2) The following words, titles, or letters or a combination thereof, with or without qualifying words or phrases, are restricted in use only to those persons individuals authorized under this part to use the terms and in a way prescribed in this part: "chiropodist", "chiropody", "chiropodical", "podiatry", "podiatrist", "podiatric", "doctor of podiatric medicine", "foot specialist", "podiatric physician and surgeon", and "d.p.m.", "physician's assistant", and "p.a.". A physician's assistant may also use the title "physician associate".